Utah statutes.
16-6a-903.   Mandatory indemnification of directors.
(1)  Unless limited by its bylaws, a nonprofit corporation shall indemnify a
director described in Subsection (2) against reasonable expenses incurred by
the director in connection with the proceeding or claim with respect to which
the director has been successful.
(2)  Subsection (1) applies to a director who was successful, on the merits or
otherwise, in the defense of:
(a)  any proceeding to which the director was a party because the director is
or was a director of the nonprofit corporation; or
(b)  any claim, issue, or matter in the proceeding, to which the director was
a party because the director is or was a director of the nonprofit
corporation.
